Illinois, session 104th, SB1034.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4    Section 5. The Uniform Act for the Extradition of Persons 5of Unsound Mind is amended by changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (405 ILCS 10/1)  (from Ch. 91 1/2, par. 121)7    Sec. 1. That That this Act may be cited as the Uniform Act 8for the Extradition of Persons of Unsound Mind.9(Source: Laws 1917, p. 345.)